Illinois, session 104th, HB1481.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-506 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-506)7    Sec. 11-506. Street racing; aggravated street racing; 8street sideshows.9    (a) No person shall engage in street racing on any street 10or highway of this State.11    (a-5) No person shall engage in a street sideshow on any 12street or highway of this State. 13    (b) No owner of any vehicle shall acquiesce in or permit 14his or her vehicle to be used by another for the purpose of 15street racing or a street sideshow.16    (b-5) A person may not knowingly interfere with or cause 17the movement of traffic to slow or stop for the purpose of 18facilitating street racing or a street sideshow. 19    (c) For the purposes of this Section:20    "Acquiesce" or "permit" means actual knowledge that the 21motor vehicle was to be used for the purpose of street racing 22or a street sideshow.23    "Motor vehicle stunt" includes, but is not limited to,   HB1481- 2 -LRB104 03493 LNS 13516 b1operating a vehicle in a manner that causes the vehicle to 2slide or spin, driving within the proximity of a gathering of 3persons, performing maneuvers to demonstrate the performance 4capability of the motor vehicle, or maneuvering the vehicle in 5an attempt to elicit a reaction from a gathering of persons. 6    "Street racing" means:7        (1) The operation of 2 or more vehicles from a point 8    side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive 9    attempt to outdistance each other; or10        (2) The operation of one or more vehicles over a 11    common selected course, each starting at the same point, 12    for the purpose of comparing the relative speeds or power 13    of acceleration of such vehicle or vehicles within a 14    certain distance or time limit; or15        (3) The use of one or more vehicles in an attempt to 16    outgain or outdistance another vehicle; or17        (4) The use of one or more vehicles to prevent another 18    vehicle from passing; or19        (5) The use of one or more vehicles to arrive at a 20    given destination ahead of another vehicle or vehicles; or21        (6) The use of one or more vehicles to test the 22    physical stamina or endurance of drivers over 23    long-distance driving routes.24    "Street sideshow" means an event in which one or more 25vehicles block or impede traffic on a street or highway, for 26the purpose of performing unauthorized motor vehicle stunts,   HB1481- 3 -LRB104 03493 LNS 13516 b1motor vehicle speed contests, or motor vehicle exhibitions of 2speed. 3    (d) Penalties.4        (1) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 5    subsection (a), (a-5), or (b-5) shall be guilty of a Class 6    A misdemeanor for the first offense and shall be subject 7    to a minimum fine of $250. Any person convicted of a 8    violation of subsection (a), (a-5), or (b-5) a second or 9    subsequent time shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony and 10    shall be subject to a minimum fine of $500. The driver's 11    license of any person convicted of subsection (a) or (a-5) 12    shall be revoked in the manner provided by Section 6-205 13    of this Code.14        (2) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 15    subsection (b) shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. 16    Any person who is convicted of subsection (b) for a second 17    or subsequent time shall be guilty of a Class A 18    misdemeanor.19        (3) Every person convicted of committing a violation 20    of subsection (a) of this Section shall be guilty of 21    aggravated street racing if the person, in committing a 22    violation of subsection (a) was involved in a motor 23    vehicle crash that resulted in great bodily harm or 24    permanent disability or disfigurement to another, where 25    the violation was a proximate cause of the injury. 26    Aggravated street racing is a Class 4 felony for which the   HB1481- 4 -LRB104 03493 LNS 13516 b1    defendant, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 2    be sentenced to not less than one year nor more than 12 3    years. 4        (4) Every person convicted of engaging in a street 5    sideshow in violation of subsection (a-5) of this Section 6    shall be guilty of aggravated engaging in a street 7    sideshow if the person, in committing a violation of 8    subsection (a-5), was involved in a motor vehicle crash 9    that resulted in great bodily harm or permanent disability 10    or disfigurement to another, where the violation was a 11    proximate cause of the injury. Aggravated engaging in a 12    street sideshow is a Class 4 felony for which the 13    defendant, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 14    be sentenced to not less than one year nor more than 12 15    years. 16(Source: P.A. 102-733, eff. 1-1-23; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 17103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.)